src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-various_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun аха: # JB ok
    аха+N+Sg+Nom : аха
    аха+N+Sg+Gen : ахын
    аха+N+Sg+Dat : ахада
    аха+N+Sg+Acc : ахые
    аха+N+Sg+Ins : ахаар
    аха+N+Sg+Com : ахатай
    аха+N+Sg+Abl : ахаһаа
    аха+N+Pl+Nom : аханар
    аха+N+Pl+Gen : аханарай
    аха+N+Pl+Dat : аханарта
    аха+N+Pl+Acc : аханарые
    аха+N+Pl+Ins : аханараар
    аха+N+Pl+Com : аханартай
    аха+N+Pl+Abl : аханарһаа

  Noun һургуули: # JB ok
    һургуули+N+Sg+Nom : һургуули
    һургуули+N+Sg+Gen : һургуулиин
    һургуули+N+Sg+Dat : һургуулида
    һургуули+N+Sg+Acc : һургуулиие
    һургуули+N+Sg+Ins : һургууляар
    һургуули+N+Sg+Com : һургуулитай
    һургуули+N+Sg+Abl : һургуулиһаа
    һургуули+N+Pl+Nom : һургуулинууд
    һургуули+N+Pl+Gen : һургуулинуудай
    һургуули+N+Pl+Dat : һургуулинуудта
    һургуули+N+Pl+Acc : һургуулинуудые
    һургуули+N+Pl+Ins : һургуулинуудаар
    һургуули+N+Pl+Com : һургуулинуудтай
    һургуули+N+Pl+Abl : һургуулинуудһаа

  Noun ном: # JB ok
    ном+N+Sg+Nom : ном
    ном+N+Sg+Gen : номой
    ном+N+Sg+Dat : номдо
    ном+N+Sg+Acc : номые
    ном+N+Sg+Ins : номоор
    ном+N+Sg+Com : номтой
    ном+N+Sg+Abl : номһоо
    ном+N+Pl+Nom : номууд
    ном+N+Pl+Gen : номуудай
    ном+N+Pl+Dat : номуудта
    ном+N+Pl+Acc : номуудые
    ном+N+Pl+Ins : номуудаар
    ном+N+Pl+Com : номуудтай
    ном+N+Pl+Abl : номуудһаа

  Noun нохой: # JB ok
    нохой+N+Sg+Nom : нохой
    нохой+N+Sg+Gen : нохойн
    нохой+N+Sg+Dat : нохойдо
    нохой+N+Sg+Acc : нохойе
    нохой+N+Sg+Ins : нохойгоор
    нохой+N+Sg+Com : нохойтой
    нохой+N+Sg+Abl : нохойһоо
    нохой+N+Pl+Nom : нохойнууд
    нохой+N+Pl+Gen : нохойнуудай
    нохой+N+Pl+Dat : нохойнуудта
    нохой+N+Pl+Acc : нохойнуудые
    нохой+N+Pl+Ins : нохойнуудаар
    нохой+N+Pl+Com : нохойнуудтай
    нохой+N+Pl+Abl : нохойнуудһаа

  Noun жороо: # JB ok
    жороо+N+Sg+Nom : жороо
    жороо+N+Sg+Gen : жороогой
    жороо+N+Sg+Dat : жороодо
    жороо+N+Sg+Acc : жороое
    жороо+N+Sg+Ins : жороогоор
    жороо+N+Sg+Com : жороотой
    жороо+N+Sg+Abl : жорооһоо
    жороо+N+Pl+Nom : жороонууд
    жороо+N+Pl+Gen : жороонуудай
    жороо+N+Pl+Dat : жороонуудта
    жороо+N+Pl+Acc : жороонуудые
    жороо+N+Pl+Ins : жороонуудаар
    жороо+N+Pl+Com : жороонуудтай
    жороо+N+Pl+Abl : жороонуудһаа

  Noun морин: # JB ok
    морин+N+Sg+Nom : морин
    морин+N+Sg+Gen : мориной
    морин+N+Sg+Dat : мориндо
    морин+N+Sg+Acc : мориие
    морин+N+Sg+Ins : морёор
    морин+N+Sg+Com : [моритой, моринтой]
    морин+N+Sg+Abl : моринһоо
    морин+N+Pl+Nom : морид
    морин+N+Pl+Gen : моридой
    морин+N+Pl+Dat : моридто
    морин+N+Pl+Acc : моридые
    морин+N+Pl+Ins : моридоор
    морин+N+Pl+Com : моридтой
    морин+N+Pl+Abl : моридһоо

  Noun һанаан: # JB ok
    һанаан+N+Sg+Nom : һанаан
    һанаан+N+Sg+Gen : һанаанай
    һанаан+N+Sg+Dat : һанаанда
    һанаан+N+Sg+Acc : һанаае
    һанаан+N+Sg+Ins : һанаагаар
    һанаан+N+Sg+Com : [һанаатай, һанаантай]
    һанаан+N+Sg+Abl : һанаанһаа

  Noun ан: # JB ok
    ан+N+Sg+Nom : ан
    ан+N+Sg+Gen : ангай
    ан+N+Sg+Dat : анда
    ан+N+Sg+Acc : ангые
    ан+N+Sg+Ins : ангаар
    ан+N+Sg+Com : антай
    ан+N+Sg+Abl : ангһаа
    ан+N+Pl+Nom : ангууд
    ан+N+Pl+Gen : ангуудай
    ан+N+Pl+Dat : ангуудта
    ан+N+Pl+Acc : ангуудые
    ан+N+Pl+Ins : ангуудаар
    ан+N+Pl+Com : ангуудтай
    ан+N+Pl+Abl : ангуудһаа
